Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.061

Disability retirement—Criminal conduct.

A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW 41.26.120, 41.26.125, 41.26.130, or 41.26.470 if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

[ 1997 c 103 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 103: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1997 c 103 s 4.]

Effective date—1997 c 103: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 21, 1997]." [ 1997 c 103 s 5.]